Utah statutes.
31A-22-304.   Motor vehicle liability policy minimum limits.

Policies containing motor vehicle liability coverage may not limit the insurer's liability under that coverage below the following:

(1) (a)  $25,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of one person, arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one accident;

(b)  subject to the limit for one person in Subsection (1)(a), in the amount of $65,000 because of liability for bodily injury to or death of two or more persons arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one accident; and

(c)  in the amount of $15,000 because of liability for injury to, or destruction of, property of others arising out of the use of a motor vehicle in any one accident; or

(2)  $80,000 in any one accident whether arising from bodily injury to or the death of others, or from destruction of, or damage to, the property of others.

